Maine, session 132, LD1040.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §17806, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 635, Pt. NN, §1,
is further amended to read:
A. Except as provided in paragraphs A‑1, A‑2 and A‑3, whenever there is a percentage
increase in the Consumer Price Index from July 1st to June 30th, the board shall
automatically make an equal percentage increase in retirement benefits, beginning in
September, up to a maximum annual increase of 3%. Effective July 1, 2011, the
increase applies to that portion of the retirement benefit up to $20,000, which amount
must be indexed in subsequent years by the same percentage adjustments granted under
this section. Effective July 1, 2022, the increase applies to that portion of the retirement
benefit up to $24,186.25, which amount must be indexed in subsequent years by the
same percentage adjustments granted under this section. Effective July 1, 2026, for
retired state employees and teachers who retired on or before June 30, 2011 or their
beneficiaries, the increase applies to that portion of the retirement benefit up to
$40,000, which amount must be indexed in subsequent years by the same percentage
adjustments granted under this section.